Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2466.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 406(a)(2) and (4) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, are amended to read:Section 406. Sales by Liquor Licensees; Restrictions.--(a) 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 * * *(2) [Hotel] Except as provided under section 418, hotel and restaurant liquor licensees, municipal golf course restaurant liquor licensees and privately-owned public golf course restaurant licensees may sell liquor and malt or brewed beverages only after seven o'clock antemeridian of any day until two o'clock antemeridian of the following day, except Sunday, and except as hereinafter provided, may sell liquor and malt or brewed beverages on Sunday between the hours of twelve o'clock midnight and two o'clock antemeridian.* * *(4) Hotel and restaurant liquor licensees, municipal golf course restaurant liquor licensees and privately-owned public golf course restaurant licensees which do not qualify for and purchase such special permit, their servants, agents or employes may sell liquor and malt or brewed beverages only after seven o'clock antemeridian of any day and until two o'clock antemeridian of the following day, and shall not sell after two o'clock antemeridian on Sunday, except as provided under section 418. No club licensee or its servants, agents or employes may sell liquor or malt or brewed beverages between the hours of three o'clock antemeridian and seven o'clock antemeridian on any day, except as provided under section 418 . No public service liquor licensee or its servants, agents, or employes may sell liquor or malt or brewed beverages between the hours of two o'clock antemeridian and seven o'clock antemeridian on any day.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 418. Event Permits.--(a) The following licensees may apply to the board for an event permit:20260HB2466PN3334 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A hotel liquor licensee.(2) A restaurant liquor licensee.(3) A club liquor licensee.(4) A retail dispenser.(5) A club retail dispenser.(6) A brewery licensee.(7) A brew pub licensee.(8) A limited winery licensee.(9) A limited distillery licensee.(b) Subject to subsections (c), (d) and (e), an event permit shall authorize the permit holder to sell liquor or malt or brewed beverages in accordance with the permit holder's underlying license beginning at six o'clock antemeridian on the day of the event and ending at four o'clock antemeridian on the following day.(c) An event permit shall not authorize sales on Sunday unless the permit holder holds a permit authorizing Sunday sales or is otherwise authorized under this act to sell on Sunday.(d) If the permit holder is authorized under this act to sell on Sunday, the following shall apply:(1) If the event begins on Sunday, sales may begin at six o'clock antemeridian on Sunday and continue until four o'clock antemeridian on Monday.(2) If the event begins on Saturday, sales may begin at six o'clock antemeridian on Saturday and continue until four o'clock antemeridian on Sunday.(e) If the permit holder is not authorized under this act to sell on Sunday, the following shall apply:(1) If the event begins on Saturday, sales may begin at six o'clock antemeridian on Saturday and continue until two o'clock 20260HB2466PN3334 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 antemeridian on Sunday.(2) The permit holder may not obtain an event permit for an event beginning on Sunday.(f) A licensee applying for an event permit shall pay a fee of five hundred dollars ($500) for the first event permit issued to the licensee in a calendar year. No additional fee shall be charged for a subsequent event permit issued to the same licensee in the same calendar year. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited into The State Stores Fund. A fee paid under this subsection shall be nonrefundable.(g) A licensee must apply for an event permit at least sixty (60) days before the day of the event.(h) The board may approve or disapprove an application for an event permit if the applicant:(1) failed to provide timely notice of the event;(2) does not intend to conduct an event that meets the requirements of this act;(3) previously conducted an event that did not meet the requirements of this act; or(4) is otherwise in violation of this act or the board's regulations.(i) An event permit shall be valid for one event only. (j) Event permits issued to the same licensee may not be used fewer than six (6) days apart, as measured from the first day of each event.(k) A licensee may not be issued more than ten event permits in a calendar year.(l) At least thirty (30) days before the day of the event, the permit holder shall provide written notice to the board. The board may waive the notice requirement under this subsection.20260HB2466PN3334 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (m) At least seven (7) days before the day of the event, the permit holder shall provide written notice of the event to the enforcement bureau and to the local police department or, if there is no local police department, to the Pennsylvania State Police.(n) A violation of this act or the board's regulations governing conduct under an event permit may constitute a basis for any of the following:(1) The issuance of a citation under section 471.(2) The nonrenewal of the underlying license under section 470.(3) The refusal by the board to issue a subsequent event permit to the licensee.(o) The remedies under subsection (n) shall be in addition to any other remedy available to the board or the enforcement bureau.Section 3. Section 492(5) and (7) of the act are amended to read:Section 492. Unlawful Acts Relative to Malt or Brewed Beverages and Licensees.--It shall be unlawful--* * *(5) Sales of Malt or Brewed Beverages by Hotels, Eating Places or Public Service Licensees During Prohibited Hours.--[For] Except as provided under section 418, for any hotel or eating place holding a retail dispenser's license, or the servants, agents or employes of such licensees, to sell, trade or barter in malt or brewed beverages between the hours of two o'clock antemeridian Sunday and seven o'clock in the forenoon of the following Monday, or between the hours of two o'clock 20260HB2466PN3334 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 antemeridian and seven o'clock antemeridian of any week day: Provided, That notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, whenever the thirty-first day of December falls on a Sunday such sales of malt or brewed beverages may be made on such day after one o'clock postmeridian and until two o'clock antemeridian of the following day. For any public service licensee authorized to sell malt or brewed beverages or the servants, agents or employes of such licensees to sell, trade or barter in malt or brewed beverages between the hours of two o'clock antemeridian and seven o'clock antemeridian on any day.(7) Clubs Selling Between Three O'Clock Antemeridian and Seven O'Clock Antemeridian. [For] Except as provided under section 418, for any club retail dispenser, or its servants, agents or employes, to sell malt or brewed beverages between the hours of three o'clock antemeridian and seven o'clock antemeridian on any day.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2466PN3334 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718